l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
FLAG long
SFX pF Y 54
SFX pF oir oir/n'q'd'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir oyant/n'q'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir u/L'D'Q' voir
SFX pF oir us/D'Q' voir
SFX pF oir ue/L'D'Q' voir
SFX pF oir ues/D'Q' voir
SFX pF oir ois/n'q'j'l'm't' voir
SFX pF oir oit/n'q'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir oyons/n'q'l't' voir
SFX pF oir oyez/n'q'l'm' voir
SFX pF oir oient/n'q'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir oyais/n'q'j'l'm't' voir
SFX pF oir oyait/n'q'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir oyions/n'q'l't' voir
SFX pF oir oyiez/n'q'l'm' voir
SFX pF oir oyaient/n'q'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir is/n'q'j'l'm't' voir
SFX pF oir it/n'q'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir îmes/n'q'l't' voir
SFX pF oir îtes/n'q'l'm' voir
SFX pF oir irent/n'q'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir errai/n'q'j'l'm't' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oirai évoir
SFX pF oir erras/n'q'l'm't' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oiras évoir
SFX pF oir erra/n'q'l'm't's' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oira évoir
SFX pF oir errons/n'q'l't' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oirons évoir
SFX pF oir errez/n'q'l'm' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oirez évoir
SFX pF oir erront/n'q'l'm't's' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oiront évoir
SFX pF oir errais/n'q'j'l'm't' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oirais évoir
SFX pF oir errait/n'q'l'm't's' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oirait évoir
SFX pF oir errions/n'q'l't' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oirions évoir
SFX pF oir erriez/n'q'l'm' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oiriez évoir
SFX pF oir erraient/n'q'l'm't's' [^é]voir
SFX pF oir oiraient évoir
SFX pF oir oie/n'q'j'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir oies/n'l'm't' voir
SFX pF oir isse/n'q'j'l'm't' voir
SFX pF oir isses/n'q'l'm't' voir
SFX pF oir ît/n'q'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir issions/n'q'l't' voir
SFX pF oir issiez/n'q'l'm' voir
SFX pF oir issent/n'q'l'm't's' voir
SFX pF oir ois/n'l'm' voir
SFX pF oir oyons/n'l' voir
SFX pF oir oyez/n'l'm' voir

SFX pG Y 11
SFX pG oir errai voir
SFX pG oir erras voir
SFX pG oir erra voir
SFX pG oir errons voir
SFX pG oir errez voir
SFX pG oir erront voir
SFX pG oir errais voir
SFX pG oir errait voir
SFX pG oir errions voir
SFX pG oir erriez voir
SFX pG oir erraient voir

SFX pH Y 43
SFX pH ouvoir ouvoir/n'q'd'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvant/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir u/L'D'Q' .mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir us/D'Q' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ue/L'D'Q' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ues/D'Q' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir eus/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir eut/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvons/n'q'l't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvez/n'q'l'm' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir euvent/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvais/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvait/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvions/n'q'l't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouviez/n'q'l'm' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvaient/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir us/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ut/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ûmes/n'q'l't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ûtes/n'q'l'm' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir urent/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrai/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvras/n'q'l'm't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvra/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrons/n'q'l't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrez/n'q'l'm' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvront/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrais/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrait/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvrions/n'q'l't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvriez/n'q'l'm' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvraient/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir euve/n'q'j'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir euves/n'l'm't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir usse/n'q'j'l'm't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir usses/n'q'l'm't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ût/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ussions/n'q'l't' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ussiez/n'q'l'm' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ussent/n'q'l'm't's' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir eus/n'l'm' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvons/n'l' mouvoir
SFX pH ouvoir ouvez/n'l'm' mouvoir

SFX pI N 2
SFX pI ouvoir û/q' mouvoir
SFX pI ouvoir u/q' mouvoir

SFX pJ N 42
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyant pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvu pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvus pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvue pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvues pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvois pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoit pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyons pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyez pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoient pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyais pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyait pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyions pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyiez pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyaient pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvus pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvut pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvûmes pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvûtes pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvurent pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirai pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoiras pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoira pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirons pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirez pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoiront pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirais pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirait pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoirions pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoiriez pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoiraient pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoie pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoies pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvusse pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvusses pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvût pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvussions pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvussiez pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvussent pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvois pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyons pourvoir
SFX pJ ourvoir ourvoyez pourvoir

SFX pK Y 43
SFX pK cevoir cevoir/n'q'd'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevant/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çu/L'D'Q' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çus/D'Q' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çue/L'D'Q' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çues/D'Q' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çois/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çoit/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevons/n'q'l't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevez/n'q'l'm' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çoivent/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevais/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevait/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevions/n'q'l't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir ceviez/n'q'l'm' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevaient/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çus/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çut/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çûmes/n'q'l't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çûtes/n'q'l'm' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çurent/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevrai/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevras/n'q'l'm't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevra/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevrons/n'q'l't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevrez/n'q'l'm' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevront/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevrais/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevrait/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevrions/n'q'l't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevriez/n'q'l'm' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevraient/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çoive/n'q'j'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çoives/n'l'm't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çusse/n'q'j'l'm't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çusses/n'q'l'm't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çût/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çussions/n'q'l't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çussiez/n'q'l'm' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çussent/n'q'l'm't's' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir çois/n'l'm't' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevons/n'l' cevoir
SFX pK cevoir cevez/n'l'm' cevoir

SFX pM N 40
SFX pM aloir alant valoir
SFX pM aloir alu valoir
SFX pM aloir aux valoir
SFX pM aloir aut valoir
SFX pM aloir alons valoir
SFX pM aloir alez valoir
SFX pM aloir alent valoir
SFX pM aloir alais valoir
SFX pM aloir alait valoir
SFX pM aloir alions valoir
SFX pM aloir aliez valoir
SFX pM aloir alaient valoir
SFX pM aloir alus valoir
SFX pM aloir alut valoir
SFX pM aloir alûmes valoir
SFX pM aloir alûtes valoir
SFX pM aloir alurent valoir
SFX pM aloir audrai valoir
SFX pM aloir audras valoir
SFX pM aloir audra valoir
SFX pM aloir audrons valoir
SFX pM aloir audrez valoir
SFX pM aloir audront valoir
SFX pM aloir audrais valoir
SFX pM aloir audrait valoir
SFX pM aloir audrions valoir
SFX pM aloir audriez valoir
SFX pM aloir audraient valoir
SFX pM aloir aille valoir
SFX pM aloir ailles valoir
SFX pM aloir aillent valoir
SFX pM aloir alusse valoir
SFX pM aloir alusses valoir
SFX pM aloir alût valoir
SFX pM aloir alussions valoir
SFX pM aloir alussiez valoir
SFX pM aloir alussent valoir
SFX pM aloir aux valoir
SFX pM aloir alons valoir
SFX pM aloir alez valoir
