l10n/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
apercevoir/pK
concevoir/pK
décevoir/pK
dépourvoir/pJ
émouvoir/pH
entrapercevoir/pK
entr'apercevoir/pK
entrevoir/pF
mouvoir/pHpI
percevoir/pK
pourvoir/pJ
prévoir/pF
promouvoir/pH
recevoir/pK
revoir/pF
valoir/pM
voir/pFpG
